Nebraska, session 109, LB569.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB569 LB569
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-1216, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-1216 In addition to any other responsibilities prescribed by the
Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, the board shall:
(1) Promote the dissemination of public information and education
programs to inform the public about emergency medical service and other
medical information, including appropriate methods of medical self-help,
first aid, and the availability of emergency medical services training
programs in the state;
(2) Provide for the collection of information for evaluation of the
availability and quality of emergency medical care, evaluate the
availability and quality of emergency medical care, and serve as a focal
point for discussion of the provision of emergency medical care;
(3) Establish model procedures for patient management in medical
emergencies that do not limit the authority of law enforcement and fire
protection personnel to manage the scene during a medical emergency;
(4) Undertake Not less than once each five years, undertake a review
and evaluation of the act and its implementation together with a review
of the emergency medical care needs of the residents of the State of
Nebraska and submit an annual report electronically a report to the
Legislature. The report shall include aggregate data on the following:
(a) Number of emergency medical services telephone calls in Nebraska; (b)
number of emergency medical services calls listed by emergency medical
services organizational status; (c) total number of emergency medical
services calls listed by emergency medical services primary patient
caregiver level of care; (d) the average response times for each region;
(e) the age range of patients; (f) the nature of each patient complaint;
(g) provider impression for each patient; (h) disposition of each
patient; (i) number of active emergency medical services providers
licensed in Nebraska; and (j) data with comparisons to other national
regions or states with any recommendations which it may have; and
-2-

LB569 LB569
2025 2025
(5) Identify communication needs of emergency medical services and
make recommendations for development of a communications plan for a
communications network for emergency care providers and emergency medical
services.
Sec. 2. Original section 38-1216, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-